District of Columbia statutes.
7-3103

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4214, 48 DCR 6981

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3814 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).